src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective   !!= * **@CODE@** is the main lexicon
juhke:juhke A_JUHKE "alcoholic, drunkard" ; ! no. 932
kuora:ku^Ora A_KUORA "left over, remaining" ; ! no. 986
lahka:lahka A_KUORA "near, close" ; ! no. 91110
nágge:nágge A_KUORA "tight, close (e.g. in a hut)" ; ! no. 4999
slijtane:slijtane A_KUORA "worn" ; ! no. 91105
sjävdnjet:sjievdnje A_SJAEVDNJET "dark" ; ! no. 3301
umasse:umas A_UMASSE "all kinds of" ; ! no. 1343
árra:árra A_VAASSE "early" ; ! no. 91417
färrta:fä2rrta A_VAASSE "every, each and every" ; ! no. 4190
jåhteje:jåhteje A_VAASSE "mover, a person migrating" ; ! no. 91295
lihkas:lihkas A_VAASSE "lame, with a limp" ; ! no. 5477
lihkas+Use/NG:liŋkas A_VAASSE "lame, with a limp" ; ! no. 91020
norska:norska A_VAASSE "Norwegian" ; ! no. 91002
sämmi+Use/NG:samma A_VAASSE "same, identical" ; ! no. 91152
sierra:sierra A_VAASSE "special, different, separate" ; ! no. 91118
surgos:surgos A_VAASSE "sorrowful, sad" ; ! no. 91050
sämmi:sä2mmi A_VAASSE "same, identical" ; ! no. 1841
unna+Use/NG:unnes A_VAASSE "small, little" ; ! no. 90859
vásse:vás'se A_VAASSE "previous" ; ! no. 90395
vierre:vierre A_VIERRE "(bad -> worse/worst)" ; ! no. 91154
almelatj:almelatj A_EVEN_D ;
gåbbde A_EVEN_B ;
järbme A_EVEN_B ;
njállge A_EVEN_B ; !alternativ attributiv form njálga, alternativ komparering njálgap, njálgamus alt. njállgap, njallgajmus
sjnuttjo A_EVEN_NOCG_S ;
tjåvvgå A_EVEN_IES ;
tjavvga A_EVEN_0 ; ! fungerar
uhttse A_EVEN_B ; !little
suddulatj:suddulatj A_EVEN_D ;
vuojnodibme A_EVEN_0 ; !bm:m attr. vuojnodis
gullis A_ODD ;
máhtalk:máhtal A_ODD_GIS ;
nággár A_ODD ;
njálmuk:njálmu A_ODD_GIS ;
njálbmok:njálbmo A_ODD_GIS ;
nåjdes:nåj A_ODD_SIS ;
suojmuk:suojmu A_ODD_GIS ;
tjurguk:tjurgu A_ODD_GIS ;
